Missouri, session 2026, HB2673.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 42, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 42.024, to read as follows:
42.024. 1. The provisions of this section shall be known and may be cited as the
"Veterans Well-Being and Resource Outreach Act".
2. The department of mental health shall develop and implement an initiative to
encourage local veterans' organizations and veterans' support organizations to establish
programs that provide wellness checks for at-risk veterans described in this section.
3. A local veterans' organization or veterans' support organization that elects to
establish a wellness-check program under this section shall identify veterans at risk of
experiencing isolation, homelessness, or mental health issues and invite them to
participate in the program. The program shall use noninvasive methods to make initial
contact with potentially at-risk veterans.
4. The program shall provide a wellness check twice each month on each veteran
participating in the program.
5. Each wellness check shall be conducted by a veteran or by a person who has
received training on the medical, mental health, housing, and vocational needs of
veterans.
6. The person who conducts the wellness check shall communicate in real time
with the veteran participant, either in person or by telephonic or electronic means, in
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2673 2
order to assess and address the medical, mental health, housing, and vocational needs of
the veteran participant.
7. The department of mental health shall promulgate rules to implement the
provisions of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section
536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall become
effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and,
if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any
of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to
delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held
unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✔